Utah statutes.
51-7-23.   Investments previously authorized allowed until liquidated.

Any investment held by a public treasurer that as of January 1, 1989, was previously authorized, but no longer qualifies under this chapter, is considered an authorized investment until it matures or is sold.



Amended by Chapter 66, 1989 General Session

